Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Supplement, 202548-1113
Preferential treatment; when not required.

Nothing in the Nebraska Fair Employment Practice Act shall be interpreted to require any employer, employment agency, labor organization, or joint labor-management committee subject to the act to grant preferential treatment to any individual or to any group because of the race, color, religion, sex, disability, marital status, national origin, or military or veteran status of such individual or group on account of an imbalance which may exist with respect to the total number or percentage of persons of any race, color, religion, sex, disability, marital status, national origin, or military or veteran status employed by any employer, referred or classified for employment by any employment agency or labor organization, admitted to membership or classified by any labor organization, or admitted to, or employed in, any apprenticeship or other training program, in comparison with the total number or percentage of persons of such race, color, religion, sex, disability, marital status, national origin, or military or veteran status in any community, section, or other area, or in the available work force in any community, section, or other area.

Laws 1965, c. 276, § 13, p. 788;

Laws 1973, LB 266, § 9;

Laws 1977, LB 161, § 8;

Laws 1993, LB 360, § 13;

Laws 2025, LB150, § 85.